Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.393

Public safety officers—Retirement benefits—Death in the line of duty.

Retirement benefits paid under chapter 41.26, 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW to beneficiaries of public safety officers who die in the line of duty shall be paid in accordance with Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 101(h) as amended by the Fallen Hero Survivor Benefit Fairness Act of 2001.

[ 2006 c 309 s 5; 2003 c 32 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 309: See note following RCW 41.37.005.